Maryland, session 2025, HB0110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
10–119.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “License” has the meaning stated in § 11–128 of the Transportation
Article.
(3) “Motor Vehicle Administration” means the Motor Vehicle
Administration of the Department of Transportation.
(b) (1) Subject to the provisions of subsection (c) of this section, the
Administration may notify the Motor Vehicle Administration of an obligor [with a
noncommercial license who is 60 days or more out of compliance, or an obligor with a
commercial license] who is 120 days or more out of compliance[,] with the most recent order
of the court in making child support payments if:
(i) the Administration has accepted an assignment of support under
§ 5–312(b)(2) of the Human Services Article; or
(ii) the recipient of support payments has filed an application for
support enforcement services with the Administration.
(2) Upon notification by the Administration under this subsection, the
Motor Vehicle Administration:
(i) shall suspend the obligor’s license or privilege to drive in the
State; and
(ii) may issue a work–restricted license or work–restricted privilege
to drive in the State in accordance with § 16–203 of the Transportation Article.

HOUSE BILL 110 3
(c) (1) (I) 1. Before supplying any information to the Motor Vehicle
Administration under this section, AND AFTER MAKING REASONABLE ATTEMPTS TO
NOTIFY THE OBLIGOR OF NONCOMPLIANCE STATUS, INCLUDING BY WRITTEN AND
ELECTRONIC MEANS, the Administration shall[:
(i) send written notice of the proposed action to the obligor,
including notice of the obligor’s right to request an investigation on any of the following
grounds:
1. the information regarding the reported arrearage is
inaccurate;
2. suspension of the obligor’s license or privilege to drive
would be an impediment to the obligor’s current or potential employment; or
3. suspension of the obligor’s license or privilege to drive
would place an undue hardship on the obligor because of the obligor’s:
A. documented disability resulting in a verified inability to
work; or
B. inability to comply with the court order; and
2. THE MINOR CHILD IS RESIDING PRIMARILY WITH THE
OBLIGOR;
3. THE OBLIGOR HAS A DOCUMENTED DISABILITY
RESULTING IN A VERIFIED INABILITY TO WORK;
4. SUSPENSION OF THE OBLIGOR’S LICENSE OR
PRIVILEGE TO DRIVE WOULD BE AN IMPEDIMENT TO CURRENT OR POTENTIAL
EMPLOYMENT;
5. THE OBLIGOR DOES NOT HAVE THE ABILITY TO PAY
AND IS MAKING REASONABLE EFFORTS TO BECOME OR REMAIN EMPLOYED;
6. THE ADMINISTRATION REACHED AN AGREEMENT
WITH THE OBLIGOR, INCLUDING THROUGH A PAYMENT INCENTIVE PROGRAM FOR A
SCHEDULED PAYMENT OF THE ARREARAGES, OR THE COURT ISSUED AN ORDER FOR
A SCHEDULED PAYMENT OF THE ARREARAGES, AND THE ADMINISTRATION
DETERMINES THAT THE OBLIGOR IS COMPLYING WITH THE AGREEMENT OR THE
ORDER;

HOUSE BILL 110
7. SUSPENSION OF THE OBLIGOR’S LICENSE OR
PRIVILEGE TO DRIVE WOULD BE AN IMPEDIMENT TO THE OBLIGOR’S ABILITY TO
ASSIST WITH THE TRANSPORTATION NEEDS OF THE MINOR CHILD; OR
8. SUSPENSION OF THE OBLIGOR’S LICENSE OR
PRIVILEGE TO DRIVE WOULD PLACE AN UNDUE HARDSHIP ON THE MINOR CHILD,
THE CHILD SUPPORT PAYMENT RECIPIENT, OR THE OBLIGOR; AND
(ii) give the obligor a reasonable opportunity to request an
investigation of the proposed action of the Administration.
(2) (i) Upon receipt of a request for investigation from the obligor, the
Administration shall conduct an investigation to determine if any of the grounds under
paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection exist.
(ii) The Administration shall:
1. send a copy of the obligor’s request for an investigation to
the obligee by first–class mail;
2. give the obligee a reasonable opportunity to respond; and
3. consider the obligee’s response.
(iii) Upon completion of the investigation, the Administration shall
notify the obligor of the results of the investigation and the obligor’s right to appeal to the
Office of Administrative Hearings.
(3) (i) An appeal under this section shall be conducted in accordance
with Title 10, Subtitle 2 of the State Government Article.
(ii) An appeal shall be made in writing and shall be received by the
Office of Administrative Hearings within 20 days after the notice to the obligor of the
results of the investigation.
(4) If, after AFTER the investigation or appeal to the Office of
Administrative Hearings, the Administration finds that one of the grounds under
paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection exists, the Administration:
(I) may not send any information about the obligor to the Motor
Vehicle Administration IF THE ADMINISTRATION FINDS THAT ONE OF THE GROUNDS
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION EXISTS; AND
(II) MAY SEND INFORMATION ABOUT THE OBLIGOR TO THE
MOTOR VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION ONLY IF THE ADMINISTRATION VERIFIES THAT
SUSPENSION OF THE OBLIGOR’S LICENSE OR PRIVILEGE TO DRIVE IS APPROPRIATE

HOUSE BILL 110 5
BECAUSE THE OBLIGOR HAS THE FUNDS TO PAY BUT IS MAKING THE FREE AND
CONSCIOUS CHOICE TO WITHHOLD PAYMENT OR IS VOLUNTARILY IMPOVERISHED,
AS DEFINED IN § 12–201(Q) OF THIS ARTICLE.
[(5) The Administration may not send any information about an obligor to
the Motor Vehicle Administration if:
(i) the Administration reaches an agreement with the obligor
regarding a scheduled payment of the obligor’s child support arrearage or a court issues an
order for a scheduled payment of the child support arrearage; and
(ii) the obligor is complying with the agreement or court order]
PETITION THE COURT TO MAKE A FINDING THAT SUSPENSION OF THE OBLIGOR’S
LICENSE OR PRIVILEGE TO DRIVE IS APPROPRIATE UNDER THE PROVISIONS OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
2. REASONABLE ATTEMPTS TO NOTIFY THE OBLIGOR
UNDER THIS SUBPARAGRAPH SHALL INCLUDE WRITTEN AND ELECTRONIC NOTICE.
3. NOTICE OF THE COURT PETITION SHALL BE SERVED
ON THE OBLIGOR.
(II) IF, AFTER A HEARING, THE COURT DETERMINES THAT
SUSPENSION OF THE OBLIGOR’S LICENSE OR PRIVILEGE TO DRIVE IS APPROPRIATE,
THE ADMINISTRATION MAY NOTIFY THE MOTOR VEHICLE ADMINISTRATION.
(2) THE COURT MAY MAKE A FINDING THAT SUSPENSION OF THE
OBLIGOR’S LICENSE OR PRIVILEGE TO DRIVE IS APPROPRIATE IF THE
ADMINISTRATION PROVES BY CLEAR AND CONVINCING EVIDENCE THAT THE
OBLIGOR HAS THE FUNDS TO PAY THE ARREARAGE BALANCE BUT IS MAKING THE
FREE AND CONSCIOUS CHOICE TO WITHHOLD PAYMENT OR IS VOLUNTARILY
IMPOVERISHED, AS DEFINED IN § 12–201(Q) OF THIS ARTICLE.
(3) THE COURT MAY NOT MAKE A FINDING THAT SUSPENSION OF THE
OBLIGOR’S LICENSE OR PRIVILEGE TO DRIVE IS APPROPRIATE IF:
(I) THE OBLIGOR PROVES BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE
EVIDENCE ANY OF THE FOLLOWING FACTORS:
1. THE MINOR CHILD IS RESIDING PRIMARILY WITH THE
OBLIGOR;
2. THE OBLIGOR HAS A DOCUMENTED DISABILITY
RESULTING IN A VERIFIED INABILITY TO WORK;

HOUSE BILL 110
3. SUSPENSION OF THE OBLIGOR’S LICENSE OR
PRIVILEGE TO DRIVE WOULD BE AN IMPEDIMENT TO CURRENT OR POTENTIAL
EMPLOYMENT;
4. THE OBLIGOR DOES NOT HAVE THE ABILITY TO PAY
AND IS MAKING REASONABLE EFFORTS TO BECOME OR REMAIN EMPLOYED;
5. THE ADMINISTRATION REACHED AN AGREEMENT
WITH THE OBLIGOR, INCLUDING THROUGH A PAYMENT INCENTIVE PROGRAM FOR A
SCHEDULED PAYMENT OF THE ARREARAGES, OR THE COURT ISSUED AN ORDER FOR
A SCHEDULED PAYMENT OF THE ARREARAGES, AND THE COURT DETERMINES THAT
THE OBLIGOR IS COMPLYING WITH THE AGREEMENT OR THE ORDER;
6. SUSPENSION OF THE OBLIGOR’S LICENSE OR
PRIVILEGE TO DRIVE WOULD BE AN IMPEDIMENT TO THE OBLIGOR’S ABILITY TO
ASSIST WITH THE TRANSPORTATION NEEDS OF THE MINOR CHILD; OR
7. ANY OTHER CIRCUMSTANCE THAT THE COURT
DETERMINES WOULD PLACE AN UNDUE HARDSHIP ON THE MINOR CHILD, THE CHILD
SUPPORT PAYMENT RECIPIENT, OR THE OBLIGOR; OR
(II) THE INFORMATION REGARDING THE REPORTED
ARREARAGE IS INACCURATE.
(d) (1) (I) [If, after] AFTER information about an obligor is supplied to the
Motor Vehicle Administration, [the obligor’s arrearage is paid in full, the obligor has
demonstrated good faith by paying the ordered amount of support for 6 consecutive months,
the obligor is a participant in full compliance in an employment program approved by the
Administration, or the Administration finds that one of the grounds under subsection
(c)(1)(i) of this section exists] IF THE ADMINISTRATION OR THE COURT FINDS THAT THE
SUSPENSION OF THE OBLIGOR’S LICENSE OR PRIVILEGE TO DRIVE IS NOT
APPROPRIATE UNDER THIS SECTION, the Administration shall notify the Motor Vehicle
Administration to reinstate the obligor’s license or privilege to drive.
(II) THE OBLIGOR MAY MAKE A REQUEST FOR REINSTATEMENT
OF THE OBLIGOR’S LICENSE OR PRIVILEGE TO DRIVE WITH THE ADMINISTRATION
OR WITH THE COURT.
(2) [The] ON REQUEST OF THE OBLIGOR, THE Administration [may]
SHALL request that the Motor Vehicle Administration expunge a record of a suspension of
a license or privilege to drive for failure to pay child support:
(i) for an obligor who is enrolled in and compliant with an
employment program approved by the Administration; or

HOUSE BILL 110 7
(ii) if the information reported by the Administration that led to the
suspension was inaccurate.
(e) The Secretary of Human Services, in cooperation with the Secretary of
Transportation [and the Office of Administrative Hearings], shall adopt regulations to
implement this section.
(F) THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND MAY ADOPT RULES TO
IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION.
12–201.
(q) “Voluntarily impoverished” means that a parent has made the free and
conscious choice, not compelled by factors beyond the parent’s control, to render the parent
without adequate resources.
Article – Transportation
16–203.
(a) In this section, “Child Support Administration” means the Child Support
Administration of the Department of Human Services.
(b) On notification by the Child Support Administration in accordance with §
10–119 of the Family Law Article that an obligor is [60] 120 days or more out of compliance
with the most recent order of the court in making child support payments, the
Administration:
(1) Shall suspend an obligor’s license or privilege to drive in the State; and
(2) May issue a work–restricted license or work–restricted privilege to
drive.
(c) (1) Prior to the suspension of a license or the privilege to drive in the State
and the issuance of a work–restricted license or work–restricted privilege to drive under
subsection (b) of this section, the Administration shall [send written notice] MAKE
REASONABLE ATTEMPTS TO NOTIFY THE OBLIGOR of the proposed action [to the
obligor] IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 10–119(C)(1)(I)2 OF THE FAMILY LAW ARTICLE,
including notice of the obligor’s right to contest the accuracy of the information.
(2) Any contest under this subsection shall be limited to whether the
Administration has mistaken the identity of the obligor or the individual whose license or
privilege to drive has been suspended.
(d) (1) An obligor may appeal a decision of the Administration to suspend the
obligor’s license or privilege to drive.

HOUSE BILL 110
(2) At a hearing under this subsection, the issue shall be limited to whether
the Administration has mistaken the identity of the obligor or the individual whose license
or privilege to drive has been suspended.
(e) The Administration shall reinstate an obligor’s license or privilege to drive in
the State if:
(1) The Administration receives a court order to reinstate the license or
privilege to drive; or
(2) The Child Support Administration notifies the Administration that:
(i) The individual whose license or privilege to drive was suspended
is not in arrears in making child support payments;
(ii) The obligor has paid the support arrearage in full;
(iii) The obligor has demonstrated good faith by paying the ordered
amount of support for 6 consecutive months;
(iv) The obligor is a participant in full compliance in an employment
program approved by the Child Support Administration; or
(v) One of the grounds under [§ 10–119(c)(1)(i)] § 10–119(C)(3) of
the Family Law Article exists.
(f) The Secretary of Transportation, in cooperation with the Secretary of Human
Services [and the Office of Administrative Hearings], shall adopt regulations to implement
this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.